Illinois, session 104th, HB3860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.22b as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.22b)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.22b)7    Sec. 10-22.22b. (a) The provisions of this subsection 8shall not apply to the deactivation of a high school facility 9under subsection (c). Where in its judgment the interests of 10the district and of the students therein will be best served, 11to deactivate any high school facility or elementary school 12facility in the district and send the students of such high 13school in grades 9 through 12 or such elementary school in 14grades kindergarten through 8, as applicable, to schools in 15other districts. Such action may be taken only with the 16approval of the voters in the district and the approval, by 17proper resolution, of the school board of the receiving 18district. The board of the district contemplating deactivation 19shall, by proper resolution, cause the proposition to 20deactivate the school facility to be submitted to the voters 21of the district at a regularly scheduled election. Notice 22shall be published at least 10 days prior to the date of the 23election at least once in one or more newspapers published in   HB3860 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1the district or, if no newspaper is published in the district, 2in one or more newspapers with a general circulation within 3the district. The notice shall be substantially in the 4following form:5NOTICE OF REFERENDUM TO6DEACTIVATE THE ... SCHOOL FACILITY7IN SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. ........8    Notice is hereby given that on (insert date), a referendum 9will be held in ........ County (Counties) for the purpose of 10voting for or against the proposition to deactivate the ...... 11School facility in School District No. ...... and to send 12pupils in ...... School to School District(s) No. .......13    The polls will be open at .... o'clock ... m., and close at 14.... o'clock ... m. of the same day.15          ............16Dated (insert date).  17The proposition shall be in substantially the following form:18- 19    Shall the Board 20of Education of School 21District No. ....,                       YES 22..... County, Illinois, be 23authorized to deactivate            ------------------------- 24the ....  School facility 25and to send pupils in .......             NO HB3860 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1 School to School 2District(s) No. .....? 3-------------------------------------------------------------4If the majority of those voting upon the proposition in the 5district contemplating deactivation vote in favor of the 6proposition, the board of that district, upon approval of the 7board of the receiving district, shall execute a contract with 8the receiving district providing for the reassignment of 9students to the receiving district. If the deactivating 10district seeks to send its students to more than one district, 11it shall execute a contract with each receiving district. The 12length of the contract shall be for 4 2 school years, but the 13districts may renew the contract for a length of time that is 14mutually agreed upon by the districts additional one year or 2 15year periods. Contract renewals shall be executed by January 1 16of the year in which the existing contract expires. If the 17majority of those voting upon the proposition do not vote in 18favor of the proposition, the school facility may not be 19deactivated.20    The sending district shall pay to the receiving district 21an amount agreed upon by the 2 districts. 22    When the deactivation of school facilities becomes 23effective pursuant to this Section, the provisions of 24subsection (h) of Section 24-11 of this Code relative to the 25contractual continued service status of teachers having 26contractual continued service whose positions are transferred   HB3860 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1from one board to the control of a different board shall apply, 2and the positions at the school facilities being deactivated 3held by teachers, as that term is defined in subsection (a) of 4Section 24-11 of this Code, having contractual continued 5service with the school district at the time of the 6deactivation shall be transferred to the control of the board 7or boards who shall be receiving the district's students on 8the following basis:9        (1) positions of such teachers in contractual 10    continued service that were full time positions shall be 11    transferred to the control of whichever of such boards 12    such teachers shall request with the teachers making such 13    requests proceeding in the order of those with the 14    greatest length of continuing service with the board to 15    those with the shortest length of continuing service with 16    the board, provided that the number selecting one board 17    over another board or other boards shall not exceed that 18    proportion of the school students going to such board or 19    boards; and20        (2) positions of such teachers in contractual 21    continued service that were full time positions and as to 22    which there is no selection left under subparagraph 1 23    hereof shall be transferred to the appropriate board.24    The contractual continued service status of any teacher 25thereby transferred to another district is not lost and the 26receiving board is subject to the School Code with respect to   HB3860 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1such transferred teacher in the same manner as if such teacher 2was the district's employee during the time such teacher was 3actually employed by the board of the deactivating district 4from which the position was transferred.5    When the deactivation of school facilities becomes 6effective pursuant to this Section, the provisions of 7subsection (b) of Section 10-23.5 of this Code relative to the 8transfer of educational support personnel employees shall 9apply, and the positions at the school facilities being 10deactivated that are held by educational support personnel 11employees at the time of the deactivation shall be transferred 12to the control of the board or boards that will be receiving 13the district's students on the following basis:14        (A) positions of such educational support personnel 15    employees that were full-time positions shall be 16    transferred to the control of whichever of the boards the 17    employees request, with the educational support personnel 18    employees making these requests proceeding in the order of 19    those with the greatest length of continuing service with 20    the board to those with the shortest length of continuing 21    service with the board, provided that the number selecting 22    one board over another board or other boards must not 23    exceed that proportion of students going to such board or 24    boards; and25        (B) positions of such educational support personnel 26    employees that were full-time positions and as to which   HB3860 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1    there is no selection left under subdivision (A) shall be 2    transferred to the appropriate board.3The length of continuing service of any educational support 4personnel employee thereby transferred to another district is 5not lost and the receiving board is subject to this Code with 6respect to that transferred educational support personnel 7employee in the same manner as if the educational support 8personnel employee was the district's employee during the time 9the educational support personnel employee was actually 10employed by the board of the deactivating district from which 11the position was transferred. 12    (b) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to 13the reactivation of a high school facility which is 14deactivated under subsection (c). The sending district may, 15with the approval of the voters in the district, reactivate 16the school facility which was deactivated. The board of the 17district seeking to reactivate the school facility shall, by 18proper resolution, cause the proposition to reactivate to be 19submitted to the voters of the district at a regularly 20scheduled election. Notice shall be published at least 10 days 21prior to the date of the election at least once in one or more 22newspapers published in the district or, if no newspaper is 23published in the district, in one or more newspapers with a 24general circulation within the district. The notice shall be 25substantially in the following form:26NOTICE OF REFERENDUM TO  HB3860 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1REACTIVATE THE ...... SCHOOL FACILITY2IN SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. ......3    Notice is hereby given that on (insert date), a referendum 4will be held in ...... County (Counties) for the purpose of 5voting for or against the proposition to reactivate the ..... 6School facility in School District No. ..... and to 7discontinue sending pupils of School District No. ...... to 8School District(s) No. .....9    The polls will be opened at ... o'clock .. m., and closed 10at ... o'clock .. m. of the same day.11          ............12Dated (insert date).  13The proposition shall be in substantially the following form:14- 15    Shall the Board 16of Education of School                       YES 17District No. ......, 18...... County, Illinois, 19be  authorized  to                        ------------------- 20reactivate the ....  School 21facility and to discontinue sending 22pupils of School District No. ....            NO 23to School District(s) No. ......? 24-------------------------------------------------------------25    (c) The school board of any unit school district which   HB3860 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1experienced a strike by a majority of its certified employees 2that endured for over 6 months during the regular school term 3of the 1986-1987 school year, and which during the ensuing 41987-1988 school year had an enrollment in grades 9 through 12 5of less than 125 students may, when in its judgment the 6interests of the district and of the students therein will be 7best served thereby, deactivate the high school facilities 8within the district for the regular term of the 1988-1989 9school year and, for that school year only, send the students 10of such high school in grades 9 through 12 to schools in 11adjoining or adjacent districts. Such action may only be 12taken: (a) by proper resolution of the school board 13deactivating its high school facilities and the approval, by 14proper resolution, of the school board of the receiving 15district or districts, and (b) pursuant to a contract between 16the sending and each receiving district, which contract or 17contracts: (i) shall provide for the reassignment of all 18students of the deactivated high school in grades 9 through 12 19to the receiving district or districts; (ii) shall apply only 20to the regular school term of the 1988-1989 school year; (iii) 21shall not be subject to renewal or extension; and (iv) shall 22require the sending district to pay to the receiving district 23the cost of educating each student who is reassigned to the 24receiving district, such costs to be an amount agreed upon by 25the sending and receiving district but not less than the per 26capita cost of maintaining the high school in the receiving   HB3860 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12333 LNS 22501 b1district during the 1987-1988 school year. Any high school 2facility deactivated pursuant to this subsection for the 3regular school term of the 1988-1989 school year shall be 4reactivated by operation of law as of the end of the regular 5term of the 1988-1989 school year. The status as a unit school 6district of a district which deactivates its high school 7facilities pursuant to this subsection shall not be affected 8by reason of such deactivation of its high school facilities 9and such district shall continue to be deemed in law a school 10district maintaining grades kindergarten through 12 for all 11purposes relating to the levy, extension, collection and 12payment of the taxes of the district under Article 17 for the 131988-1989 school year.14    (d) Whenever a school facility is reactivated pursuant to 15the provisions of this Section, then all teachers in 16contractual continued service who were honorably dismissed or 17transferred as part of the deactivation process, in addition 18to other rights they may have under the School Code, shall be 19recalled or transferred back to the original district.20(Source: P.A. 99-657, eff. 7-28-16.)